Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 2011
85-2403
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the
Postsecondary Institution Act:

(1) Authorization
to operate means approval by the commission to operate a postsecondary institution
in this state;

(2) Authorization to operate on a continuing basis means approval
by the commission to operate a postsecondary institution in this state without
a renewal requirement;

(3) Commission means the Coordinating Commission for Postsecondary
Education;

(4)(a) Establishing a physical presence means:

(i) Offering
a course for college credit or a degree program in this state that leads to
an associate, baccalaureate, graduate, or professional degree, including:

(A) Establishing
a physical location in this state where a student may receive synchronous
or asynchronous instruction; or

(B) Offering a course or program that requires
students to physically meet in one location for instructional purposes more
than once during the course term; or

(ii) Establishing an administrative office
in this state, including:

(A) Maintaining an administrative office
in this state for purposes of enrolling students, providing information to
students about the institution, or providing student support services;

(B) Providing
office space to staff, whether instructional or noninstructional staff; or

(C) Establishing
a mailing address in this state.

(b) Physical presence does not include:

(i) Course
offerings in the nature of a short course or seminar if instruction for the
short course or seminar takes no more than twenty classroom hours;

(ii) Course
offerings on a military installation solely for military personnel or civilians
employed on such installation;

(iii) An educational experience arranged
for an individual student, such as a clinical, practicum, residency, or internship;
or

(iv)
Courses offered online or through the United States mail or similar delivery
service which do not require the physical meeting of a student with instructional
staff;

(5) Executive director means the executive director of the commission
or his or her designee;

(6) Nebraska public postsecondary institution means any public institution
established, operated, and governed by this state or any of its political
subdivisions that provides postsecondary education;

(7) Out-of-state public
postsecondary institution means any public institution with a physical presence
in Nebraska that is established, operated, and governed by another state or
any of its political subdivisions and that provides postsecondary education;

(8) Postsecondary
institution means any private postsecondary institution, out-of-state public
postsecondary institution, or Nebraska public postsecondary institution exempt
from the Private Postsecondary Career School Act; and

(9) Private postsecondary
institution means any Nebraska or out-of-state nonpublic postsecondary institution
with a physical presence in Nebraska, including any for-profit or nonprofit
institution, that provides postsecondary education.

Laws 2011, LB637, § 3.
May 5, 2011
Private Postsecondary Career School Act, see section 85-1601.